Georgia, session 2026_ss, SB3.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 2 of Title 21 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to elections and
primaries generally, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
S. B. 3EX
- 1 -

SB 3EX/FA
"21-2-301.
(a) There is created the Election Equipment Specifications and Standards Committee that
shall establish the specifications, standards, and requirements for a new uniform system of
election equipment. Such committee shall be composed the following:
(1) Three electors of the state to be appointed by the Governor;
(2) Three members of the Senate to be appointed by the Senate Committee on
Assignments, one of whom shall be designated as cochairperson; and
(3) Three members of the House of Representatives to be appointed by the Speaker of
the House of Representatives, one of whom shall be designated as cochairperson.
(b) The committee may seek advisement from, but shall not be limited to:
(1) The elections director of the Secretary of State's office, or his or her designee;
(2) The executive director of the State Election Board;
(3) The Georgia Association of Voter Registration and Election Officials;
(4) Cybersecurity experts; and
(5) Accessibility or disability experts.
(c) By January 31, 2027, the committee shall prepare a report which shall provide its
recommendations for specifications, standards, and requirements for a new uniform system
of election equipment. Such report shall be of sufficient detail so as to allow legislative
and executive policymakers to develop appropriations, procurement, and implementation
plans to provide for the use of such new uniform system of election equipment in the 2028
election cycle. The report shall be delivered to the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, the
Speaker of the House of Representatives, the Secretary of State, and the State Election
Board.
(d) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, except as provided for in paragraph (1)
of subsection (b) of this Code section, the Secretary of State in office on the effective date
of this Code section shall have no role or authority in the selection, certification, or
procurement of such new uniform system, including, but not limited to, the preparation of
S. B. 3EX
- 2 -

SB 3EX/FA
any requests for proposals, requests for qualifications, or other solicitations to potential
vendors of election equipment to be used as a part of such uniform system. Any and all
actions taken by the Secretary of State in office on the effective date of this Code section
related to the selection, certification, or procurement of a new uniform system of election
equipment shall be void and ultra vires.
(e) This Code section shall stand repealed on July 1, 2029."
SECTION 1.1.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 21-2-495, relating to procedure for recount
or recanvass of votes, losing candidate's right to a recount, and rules and regulations, by
adding a new subsection to read as follows:
"(d.1)(1) Any other provision of this Code section to the contrary notwithstanding, prior
to certification of the election results, each superintendent shall complete a manual
recount of all votes cast in any election, special election, election runoff, special election
runoff, primary, special primary, primary runoff, or special primary runoff on the two
races at the top of the ballot; provided, however, that, if there is only one race on a ballot,
a manual recount of that race is required.
(2) If, upon the conclusion of a recount pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, it
is determined that the original count was incorrect, the returns and all papers prepared by
the superintendent or the Secretary of State shall be corrected accordingly prior to
certification of such election by the superintendent."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended in Code Section 21-2-498, relating to precertification
tabulation audits and risk-limiting audits, by revising paragraph (4) of subsection (a) as
follows:
"(4) 'Selected contests' means:
S. B. 3EX
- 3 -

SB 3EX/FA
(A) The contest at the top of a ballot; and
(B) If they are on the ballot, each of the following races: presidential, United States
Senator, United States Representative, Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of
State, and Attorney General, provided that such selected contest is not the race at the
top of the ballot; and
(C) If the following races are on a ballot, one contest from the following races as
selected pursuant to subsection (d) of this Code section: United States Senate,
Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State School
Superintendent, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture,
Commissioner of Labor, Supreme Court Justice, Judge of the Court of Appeals, or
Public Service Commissioner, provided that such selected contest is not the race at the
top of the ballot."
SECTION 3.
An Act relating to elections and primaries approved May 6, 2024 (Ga. L. 2024, p. 1028),
SB 189, is amended by revising subsection (d) of Section 13 as follows:
"(d) Section 7 of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2028."
SECTION 4.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 3EX
- 4 -